src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-moam_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - моаш: # Verb-am 'appear; show'
     моаш+V+Inf: моаш
     моаш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: моам
     моаш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: моат
     моаш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: моэш
     моаш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: моына
     моаш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: моыда
     моаш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: моыт
     
     моаш+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: мо
     моаш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: моэп
#    
     моаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1: моым
     моаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg2: моыц
     моаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3: моы
     моаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1: мона
     моаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl2: мода
     моаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3: моэвӹ
     
     моаш+V+Ind+Prt1+ConNeg: мо
     моаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+ConNeg: моэп
#    
     моаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg1: моынам
     моаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg2: моынат
     моаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3: моын
     моаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl1: моынна
     моаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl2: моында
     моаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3: моыныт
     
##   
     моаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg1: моделам
     моаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg2: моделат
     моаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: моде
     моаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl1: моделна
     моаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl2: моделда
     моаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: моделыт
##   
     моаш+V+Imprt+Sg3: мо
     моаш+V+Imprt+Sg3: можы
     моаш+V+Imprt+Pl3: мода
     моаш+V+Imprt+Pl3: моышты
##   
     моаш+V+ImprtII+Sg2: моыма
     моаш+V+ImprtII+Pl2: моымада
##   
     моаш+V+Des+Sg1: монем
     моаш+V+Des+Sg2: монет
     моаш+V+Des+Sg3: монежӹ
     моаш+V+Des+Pl1: моненӓ
     моаш+V+Des+Pl2: монедӓ
     моаш+V+Des+Pl3: монештӹ
     
     
